Hawaii, session 2026, SB2670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the federal requirements for eligibility to receive assistance from programs such as medicaid, the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), and federally funded public housing have changed pursuant to Public Law No. 119-21.  For individuals who are between the ages of eighteen and fifty-four, able to work, and do not have any dependents, also known as able-bodied adults without dependents, there are now additional requirements for certain federal programs.  Able-bodied adult without dependents must now document community engagement to qualify for certain federal programs, which can consist of a combination of work, training, school, or volunteer efforts for a certain minimum number of hours per month.  These eligibility requirements have expanded to new populations of SNAP beneficiaries and are required for the first time for other programs.  The legislature believes that it is imperative to support nonprofit organizations in providing expanded or new opportunities for volunteer and training hours so that residents may more easily meet federal program eligibility requirements, contribute to the local community through volunteer work, and gain new employment skills through training. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the office of community services of the department of labor and industrial relations to award grants, pursuant to chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and other qualifications, for fiscal year 2026-2027 to nonprofit organizations that expand or create new opportunities for residents needing to meet community engagement requirements to qualify for federal programs. SECTION 2. The legislature finds and declares that the grants made pursuant to chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, under this Act are in the public interest and for the public health, safety, and general welfare. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $3,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to the office of community services of the department of labor and industrial relations for the awarding of grants made pursuant to chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the benefit of nonprofit organizations in the State of Hawaii. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of community services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  (a)  Provided that of the general fund appropriation for the office of community services of the department of labor and industrial relations (program ID LBR903) authorized under section 3, the sum of $3,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended on grants issued in accordance with chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, except where inapplicable pursuant to subsection (b), and subsection (b). (b)  In selecting recipients and awarding and administering grants funded by the appropriation contained in section 3 of this Act, there is established an evaluation and selection committee to oversee the evaluation and selection of, and determine grant award amounts to, nonprofit applicants; provided that the requirement to submit grant requests to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature pursuant to section 42F-102, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall not apply to grants applied for pursuant to this Act.  The evaluation and selection committee shall be composed of the following members: (1)  Two senators appointed by the president of the senate; and (2)  Two representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The meetings of the evaluation and selection committee shall not be subject to part I of chapter 92, Hawaii Revised Statutes. To be eligible for a grant funded by the appropriation contained in section 3, applicants shall provide documentation of the nature of planned volunteer activities or training activities that qualify for community engagement hours and how those activities will benefit the State or the participants, how participants in need of documented community service hours to verify eligibility for federally funded programs will be recruited to those programs, and how the funds will be used to expand existing programs or establish new programs.  The grants funded by the appropriation contained in section 3 shall not be used to replace current funding of existing programs. In evaluating, selecting, awarding, and administering grants funded by the appropriation contained in section 3, the evaluation and selection committee shall apply all qualifying standards, conditions, and other applicable requirements under chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to the grant recipients and their respective contracts; provided that the grant application submission deadline contained in section 42F-102, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall not apply to grants applied for and funded pursuant to this Act. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $65,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) temporary program specialist position to assist the office of community services in awarding the grants as required by this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of community services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $10,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of the attorney general to assist the office of community services review contracts and monitor costs associated with the awarding of grants as required by this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of the attorney general for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7.  If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________